Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB386.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Repairability Index Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Digital electronic equipment." A product that depends, for its functioning, in whole or in part, on digital electronics embedded in or attached to the product."Original equipment manufacturer." A company that manufactures or contracts another company to manufacture digital electronic equipment.123456789101112131415161718 "Part." A replacement part, either new or used, made available by an original equipment manufacturer for purposes of effecting the services of maintenance or repair of digital electronic equipment manufactured or sold by the original equipment manufacturer.Section 3. Duties of original equipment manufacturers.The following apply:(1) For digital electronic equipment sold or used in this Commonwealth, original equipment manufacturers shall make available, for the purposes of diagnosis and consumer information, a repairability score for the categories listed under paragraph (2). The average repairability score required under paragraph (3) shall be placed on the product packaging by sticker or other printing. Quick response codes or other codes may be used to guide a consumer to the full repairability information available on the manufacturer's or Attorney General's publicly accessible Internet website as required under section 4.(2) The original equipment manufacturer shall provide a numeric score for each of the following criteria for the digital electronic equipment. The repairability score shall range from 1, least repairable, to 10, most repairable, and shall be based on the ability to conduct maintenance or repair on digital electronic equipment manufactured by, on behalf of or sold by the original equipment manufacturer:(i) Duration and availability of technical documents and related advice on the use and maintenance of the digital electronic equipment.(ii) Ease of dismantling, tools required and other characteristics of the fasteners used or other parts.20250HB0386PN0351 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Original equipment manufacturer's estimation of the duration of parts for the product.(iv) The amount of time the original equipment manufacturer plans on manufacturing replacement parts for the digital electronic equipment.(v) Price ratio of replacement parts to the price of new equipment.(vi) Potential to recycle or dispose of the digital electronic equipment.(vii) Expertise required to safely effect the repair.(viii) Any other information deemed necessary by the Attorney General.(3) The original equipment manufacturer shall compile the average repairability score. The average repairability score shall be the average of each score criteria under paragraph (2).(4) The following information shall be included with the repairability scores:(i) Details of the digital electronic equipment:(A) Model number.(B) Manufacturer's suggested retail price.(ii) Information on the nature of software updates provided by the original equipment manufacturer.(iii) Potential for a factory reset of the product.(iv) Whether or not remote assistance is available from the original equipment manufacturer and the price charged for providing assistance.(v) Other information deemed necessary by the Attorney General.20250HB0386PN0351 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Repairability score reporting.Ninety days prior to selling digital electronic equipment in this Commonwealth, an original equipment manufacturer must submit the repairability scores, reasons given for how the equipment meets the scores chosen and information required under section 3 for the digital electronic equipment to the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall post this information on the Office of Attorney General's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 5. Enforcement by Attorney General.The following apply:(1) A violation of this act shall be considered an unlawful practice under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. All remedies, penalties and authority granted to the Attorney General by that act shall be available to the Attorney General for the enforcement of this act.(2) The Attorney General is permitted to prosecute an individual who knowingly falsifies information related to this act, submits fraudulent information to the Office of Attorney General related to this act or conspires to mislead consumers.Section 6. Applicability.This act applies to digital electronic equipment sold on or after the effective date of this section.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0386PN0351 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728